Louisiana, session 2026, HB1250.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Aerospace flight entities; motion to strike; legislative findings
A.(1) The legislature finds and declares that aerospace flight activities are
a public issue.
(2) The legislature finds and further declares that aerospace flight activities
are a sector of identified state importance as it facilitates the transport of goods or
persons. Aerospace flight activities are licensed, regulated, and supervised by the
Federal Aviation Administration under a comprehensive federal scheme that includes
informed-consent and reciprocal-waiver requirements. The continued development
of aerospace flight activities in this state advances public welfare, economic
development, and workforce investment.
(3) It is the intent of this legislation that claims arising from aerospace flight
activities be capable of early resolution without the imposition of discovery costs or
other litigation expenses that would unreasonably burden lawfully licensed aerospace
flight entities and the public entities that facilitate their operations.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1250 ENROLLED
(1) "Aerospace flight activities" mean any act or activity related to the
research, development, testing, manufacture, preparation, launch, operation, reentry,
descent, landing, or post-landing recovery of an aeronautic or astronautic launch
vehicle, craft, payload, or related equipment, including but not limited to, fueling,
integration, conditioning, and transporting, including but not limited to the transport
of goods or persons, and any associated ground support operations whether
conducted on-site or involving overflight.
(2) "Aerospace flight entity" means any person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or any other entity that conducts aerospace flight activities
and, to the extent required by federal law, holds or operates anywhere under a valid
Federal Aviation Administration license, experimental permit, or other authorization
for the relevant activities requiring such a license. This also includes any employee,
officer, director, agent, contractor, manufacturer, supplier, or vendor of such entity,
any owner or lessor of immovable property used for aerospace flight activities, and
any political subdivision or public entity with a contractual or operational
relationship facilitating such activities.
C.(1) A cause of action against an aerospace flight entity arising from any
act of the aerospace flight entity in connection with a public issue shall be subject to
a special motion to strike, unless the court determines that the plaintiff has
established a probability of success on the claim.
(2) In making its determination, the court shall consider the pleadings and
supporting and opposing affidavits stating the facts upon which the liability or
defense is based.
(3) If the court determines that the plaintiff has established a probability of
success on the claim, that determination shall be admissible in evidence at any later
stage of the proceeding.
D. In any action subject to Subsection C of this Section, a prevailing party
on a special motion to strike shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees and costs.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1250 ENROLLED
E.(1) The special motion to strike may be filed within ninety days of service
of the petition, or in the court's discretion, at any later time upon terms the court
deems proper.
(2) If the plaintiff voluntarily dismisses the action prior to the running of the
delays for filing an answer, the aerospace flight entity shall retain the right to file a
special motion to strike within the delays provided by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, and the motion shall be heard pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
(3) The motion shall be noticed for hearing not more than thirty days after
service unless the docket conditions of the court require a later hearing.
F. All discovery proceedings in the action shall be stayed upon the filing of
a notice of motion made pursuant to this Section. The stay of discovery shall remain
in effect until notice of entry of the order ruling on the motion. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this Section, the court, on noticed motion and for good cause shown,
may order that specified discovery be conducted.
G. This Section does not apply to any enforcement action brought on behalf
of this state by the attorney general, district attorney, or city attorney acting as a
public prosecutor.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.